Utah statutes.
17-43-306.   Fees for mental health services -- Responsibility for cost of
service if rendered by authority to nonresident -- Authority may receive funds
from other sources.
(1)  Each local mental health authority shall charge a fee for mental health
services, except that mental health services may not be refused to any person
because of inability to pay.
(2)  If a local mental health authority, through its designated provider,
provides a service described in Section 17-43-301 to a person who resides
within the jurisdiction of another local mental health authority, the local
mental health authority in whose jurisdiction the person resides is
responsible for the cost of that service if its designated provider has
authorized the provision of that service.
(3)  A local mental health authority and entities that contract with a local
mental health authority to provide mental health services may receive funds
made available by federal, state, or local health, substance abuse, mental
health, education, welfare, or other agencies, in accordance with the
provisions of this part and Title 62A, Chapter 15, Substance Abuse and Mental
Health Act.
